Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5025.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4-1-26 of the General Laws in Chapter 4-1 entitled "Cruelty to
Animals" is hereby amended to read as follows:
4-1-26. Abandonment of animals.
(a) If any person having possession and/or control of an animal abandons that animal on a
street, road, highway or in a public place or on private property or from a motor vehicle, or in a
dwelling or any other building or structure without providing for the care of that animal, he or she
shall be punished in the manner provided in § 4-1-2 for each such offense. If this abandonment
results in the death of the animal, the person shall be punished in the manner provided in § 4-1-5.
Abandonment means the relinquishment of all right, title, claim, or possession of the animal with
the intention of not reclaiming it or resuming its ownership or possession.
(b) Any pound or animal shelter as defined under § 4-19-2, shall deem abandoned any
animal impounded and not redeemed by its owner within ten (10) days of impoundment if such
animal is wearing identification. Any animal impounded and not wearing identification shall be
deemed abandoned if not redeemed by its owner within five (5) days of impoundment. Any animal
deemed abandoned shall become the property of the impounding agency and may be adopted.
(c) Any pound or animal shelter shall make a prompt and reasonable attempt to locate and
notify the owner of the impounded animal, including scanning the animal for a microchip.
(d) It shall not be considered abandonment, and the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section and of § 4-24-8 shall not apply to any person who traps unowned feral or free roaming cats,

causes those cats to be spayed or neutered, and subsequently releases those cats, provided:
(1) Any medical or surgical procedures performed on those cats are performed by a licensed
veterinarian; and
(2) The cats are returned to the property where they were trapped.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000319
========
LC000319 - Page 2 of 3